Washington statutes.
RCW 10.110.040

Treatment in hospital emergency department.

In a case where an individual accompanied or otherwise secured by an officer pursuant to chapter 267, Laws of 2015 is waiting for treatment in a hospital emergency department, the hospital shall see the patient in as expeditious a manner as possible, while taking into consideration best triage practices and federal and state legal obligations regarding appropriate screening and treatment of patients.

[ 2015 c 267 s 3.]